test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-kont_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted nouns, without the ones which only are in plural. Lexicon SARVES, GUOMOJ, SVÁLES, GÅHKES, SJUOKKAJ, GISTÁ, ÅLMÅJ (old SUOLOJ), ÅLMÅJ_LOAN. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested.

Tests:
  Noun - sváles: # SVÁLES
    sváles+N+Sg+Nom: sváles
    sváles+N+Sg+Gen: svállá
    sváles+N+Sg+Ill: sválláj
    sváles+N+Pl+Ill: svállájda
    sváles+N+Ess: [svállán, sválen]
    sváles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: svállásj
    sváles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: svállátjasj
    sváles+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: sválládibme
    sváles+N+Abe: [sválládak, sválláda] #Inga is not used to the -da, but documented in Grundstöm

  Noun - viepses: # SARVES
    viepses+N+Sg+Nom: viepses
    viepses+N+Sg+Gen: [væppsá, väppsá]
    viepses+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [væppsáma, väppsáma]
    viepses+N+Sg+Acc: [væppsáv, väppsáv]
    viepses+N+Sg+Ine: [væppsán, väppsán]
    viepses+N+Sg+Ill: [væppsáj, väppsáj]
    viepses+N+Sg+Ela: [væppsás, väppsás]
    viepses+N+Sg+Com: [væppsájn, väppsájn]
    viepses+N+Pl+Nom: [væppsá, väppsá]
    viepses+N+Pl+Gen: [væppsáj, väppsáj]
    viepses+N+Pl+Acc: [væppsájt, väppsájt]
    viepses+N+Pl+Ine: [væppsájn, väppsájn]
    viepses+N+Pl+Ill: [væppsájda, väppsájda]
    viepses+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [væppsájdiseda, väppsájdiseda]
    viepses+N+Pl+Ela: [væppsájs, väppsájs]
    viepses+N+Pl+Com: [væppsáj, väppsáj]
    viepses+N+Ess: [væppsán, väppsán, viepsen]
    viepses+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [væppsásj, väppsásj]
    viepses+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [væppsátjasj, väppsátjasj]
    viepses+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [væppsádibme, väppsádibme]
    viepses+N+Abe: [væppsádak, væppsáda, väppsáda, väppsádak]

  Noun - bálges: # SARVES
    bálges+N+Sg+Nom: bálges
    bálges+N+Sg+Acc: bálggáv
    bálges+N+Pl+Com: bálggáj
    bálges+N+Ess: [bálggán, bálgen]

  Noun - boadnjesasses: # SARVES
    boadnjesasses+N+Sg+Nom: boadnjesasses
    boadnjesasses+N+Sg+Ill: boadnjesassáj

  Noun - goabdes: # SARVES
    goabdes+N+Sg+Nom: goabdes
    goabdes+N+Sg+Ine: goabddán
    goabdes+N+Sg+Ill: goabddáj

  Noun - ålmåj: # ÅLMÅJ
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmåj
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Gen: ålmmå
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ålmmåma
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Acc: ålmmåv
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ine: ålmmån
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ill: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Ela: ålmmås
    ålmåj+N+Sg+Com: ålmmåjn
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Nom: ålmmå
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Gen: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Acc: ålmmåjt
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ine: ålmmåjn
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ill: ålmmåjda
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: ålmmåjdiseda
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Ela: ålmmåjs
    ålmåj+N+Pl+Com: ålmmåj
    ålmåj+N+Ess: [ålmmån, ålmån]
    ålmåj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ålmmåsj
    ålmåj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ålmmåtjasj
    ålmåj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ålmmådibme
    ålmåj+N+Abe: [ålmmådak, ålmmåda]

  Noun - suoloj: # ÅLMÅJ
    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: suoloj
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ine: suollun
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ill: suolluj
    suoloj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: suollusj
    suoloj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: suollutjasj
    suoloj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: suolludibme
    suoloj+N+Abe: [suolludak, suolluda]

  Noun - sáttoj: # ÅLMÅJ
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Nom: sáttoj
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Ine: sáddun
    sáttoj+N+Sg+Ill: sádduj

  Noun - tjoavtjoj: #  ÅLMÅJ
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Nom: tjoavtjoj
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Ine: tjoaktjun
    tjoavtjoj+N+Sg+Ill: tjoaktjuj

  Noun - ænoj: # ÅLMÅJ
    ænoj+N+Sg+Nom: [ænoj, änoj]
    ænoj+N+Pl+Nom: [æddnu, äddnu]
    ænoj+N+Sg+Ill: [æddnuj, äddnuj]
    ænoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [æddnusj, äddnusj]
    
  Noun - tjijnoj: # ÅLMÅJ_LOAN
    tjijnoj+N+Sg+Nom: tjijnoj
    tjijnoj+N+Pl+Nom: tjijnnu
    tjijnoj+N+Sg+Ill: tjijnnuj
    tjijnoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjijnnusj
    
  Noun - bistroj: # ÅLMÅJ_LOAN
    bistroj+N+Sg+Nom: bistroj
    bistroj+N+Sg+Gen: bisstru
    bistroj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bisstruma
    bistroj+N+Sg+Acc: bisstruv
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ine: bisstrun
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ill: bisstruj
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ela: bisstrus
    bistroj+N+Sg+Com: bisstrujn
    bistroj+N+Pl+Nom: bisstru
    bistroj+N+Pl+Gen: bisstruj
    bistroj+N+Pl+Acc: bisstrujt
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ine: bisstrujn
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ill: bisstrujda
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: bisstrujdiseda
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ela: bisstrujs
    bistroj+N+Pl+Com: bisstruj
    bistroj+N+Ess: [bisstrun, bistru]
    bistroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bisstrusj
    bistroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bisstrutjasj
    bistroj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bisstrudibme
    bistroj+N+Abe: [bisstrudak, bisstruda]

  Noun - boatsoj: # GUOMOJ
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Nom: boatsoj
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Ine: boahttsun
    boatsoj+N+Sg+Ill: boahttsuj
    boatsoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boahttsusj
    boatsoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boahttsutjasj
    boatsoj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: boahttsudibme
    boatsoj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    boatsoj+N+Abe: [boahttsudak, boahttsuda]

  Noun - vuostoj: # ÅLMÅJ and ÅRES
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Nom: vuostoj
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Ine: [vuosstun, vuosstuhin]
    vuostoj+N+Sg+Ill: [vuosstuj, vuosstuhij]

  Noun - gåhkes: # GÅHKES
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkes
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Ine: gåhkkån
    gåhkes+N+Sg+Ill: gåhkkåj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåsj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåsj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåtjasj
    gåhkes+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: gåhkkådibme
    gåhkes+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gåhkes+N+Abe: [gåhkkådak, gåhkkåda]

  Noun - sjuokkaj: # SJUOKKAJ
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Nom: sjuokkaj
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Ine: sjuoggán
    sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Ill: sjuoggáj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuoggásj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuoggátjasj
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: sjuoggádibme
    sjuokkaj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sjuokkaj+N+Abe: [sjuoggádak, sjuoggáda]

  Noun - gistá: # GISTÁ
    gistá+N+Sg+Nom: gistá
    gistá+N+Sg+Ine: gisstán
    gistá+N+Sg+Ill: gisstáj
    gistá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gisstásj
    gistá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gisstátjasj
    gistá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: gisstádibme
    gistá+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gistá+N+Abe: [gisstádak, gisstáda]
